Vermont, session 2025-2026, S201.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 187 is added to read:
§ 187. ACADEMIC FREEDOM
(a) It is the policy of the State of Vermont to maintain and encourage full
freedom of inquiry, teaching, and research and the free exchange of ideas in
postsecondary schools that operate in Vermont in order to ensure such schools
allow for robust and uninhibited discussion of issues.
VT LEG #385737 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.201
2026 Page 2 of 2
(b) Postsecondary schools that operate in Vermont shall adopt an academic
freedom policy that complies with the State policy contained in subsection (a)
of this section and that:
(1) provides faculty with the freedom of discussion of any material
relevant to any course that a faculty member has been assigned to teach;
(2) places no unreasonable restrictions upon instructional methods; and
(3) provides faculty with the same freedom of expression and speech
outside the workplace as private citizens are afforded; provided, however, that
the faculty member shall disclaim any representation on behalf of the
postsecondary school when such representation could reasonably be perceived
within the community where the utterance is made.
Sec. 2. POLICY ADOPTION
Postsecondary schools operating in Vermont shall adopt an academic
freedom policy consistent with Sec. 1 of this act on or before August 1, 2027.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385737 v.2